New Jersey, session 221, A1761.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in P.L.    , c.    (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill): "Critical" means sited, recommended, or promoted by a State department or agency or by the Governor as a project of economic necessity which will increase employment during a period of economic downturn. "Infrastructure project" means any transportation or highway project; sewerage project; water supply project; or building project constructed by the State or any political subdivision thereof, including, but not limited to, a school district. 2.    Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a State department or agency, or political subdivision of the State, in making or awarding a contract for a critical infrastructure project or part or portion thereof to be financed from State funds, shall grant a preference for such contract to qualified businesses located in the State of New Jersey employing residents of the State, up to the limits set forth under rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to section 3 of P.L.    , c.    (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 3.    The Department of the Treasury shall promulgate rules and regulations, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) to identify qualified businesses under section 2 of P.L.    , c.    (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  The rules and regulations shall also set forth limits on the amount of preference that may be given to a qualified business located in New Jersey employing residents of the State. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately, except that section 2 shall remain inoperative until the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to section 3 shall have become effective.